Vermont statutes. Title 17 Elections
Subchapter 2. Town Meetings and Local Elections in General

§ 2640.
Annual meetings.

A meeting of the legal voters of each town shall be held annually on the first Tuesday of March for the election of officers and the transaction of other business, and it may be adjourned to another date. When a municipality fails to hold an annual meeting, a warning for a subsequent meeting shall be issued immediately, and at that meeting all the officers required by law may be elected and its business transacted.

When a town so votes, it may thereafter start its annual meeting on any of the three days immediately preceding the first Tuesday in March at such time as it elects and may transact at that time any business not involving voting by Australian ballot or voting required by law to be by ballot and to be held on the first Tuesday in March. A meeting so started shall be adjourned until the first Tuesday in March.

Notwithstanding section 2508 of this title, public discussion of ballot issues and all other issues appearing in the warning, other than election of candidates, shall be permitted at the annual meeting, regardless of the location of the polling place.
(c) (1) Notwithstanding section 2508 of this title, public discussion of ballot issues and all other issues appearing in the warning, other than election of candidates, shall be permitted at the annual meeting, regardless of the location of the polling place.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subdivision (1) of this subsection, a candidate for local office nominated from the floor at the annual meeting may introduce his or her candidacy to the extent permitted by the voters at the meeting.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1991, No. 118

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. Feb. 26, 1992;

2007, No. 121

(Adj. Sess.), § 11;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 45;

2017, No. 50

, § 49.

§ 2640a.
Representative annual meetings.

A municipality with a population of 5,000 or greater may vote at a special or annual town meeting to establish a representative form of annual or special meeting.

A representative form of annual or special meeting is a meeting of members elected by district to exercise the powers vested in the voters of the town to act upon articles. However, the election of officers, public questions, and all articles to be voted upon by Australian ballot as required by law or as voted under section 2680 of this title at a prior annual or special meeting, and reconsideration of articles under section 2661 of this title shall remain vested in the voters of the town.
(b) (1) A representative form of annual or special meeting is a meeting of members elected by district to exercise the powers vested in the voters of the town to act upon articles. However, the election of officers, public questions, and all articles to be voted upon by Australian ballot as required by law or as voted under section 2680 of this title at a prior annual or special meeting, and reconsideration of articles under section 2661 of this title shall remain vested in the voters of the town.

An organizational resolution to adopt a representative form of annual or special meeting may be made by the legislative body of the municipality or by petition of five percent of the voters of the municipality. An official copy of the organizational resolution shall be filed in the office of the clerk of the municipality at least 10 days before the annual or special meeting at which the vote whether to adopt the organizational resolution shall take place, and copies thereof shall be made available to members of the public upon request.

An organizational resolution shall include the following:

a certain number of elected members, a range of elected members, or a ratio of elected members to the number of voters. However, in no case shall the number of elected members be less than 100;

a certain number of districts and the boundaries of those districts;

who shall be ex officio voting members, if any, of the meeting;

the procedure for conducting the representative meeting;

specific action, if any, to be taken at the representative meeting; and

a procedure whereby the voters of the municipality may reconsider any action taken at a representative meeting.

The form of the question of whether to establish a representative form of annual or special meeting shall be substantially as follows: “Shall the [name of municipality] adopt the representative form of annual or special meeting as set forth in the organizational resolution?”

A vote establishing a representative form of annual or special meeting shall remain in effect until the municipality votes to discontinue or establish a new representative form of annual or special meeting at an annual or special meeting duly warned for that purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

2009, No. 125

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2641.
Warning and notice required; publication of warnings.

The legislative body of a municipality shall warn a meeting by posting a warning and notice in at least two public places in the municipality, and in or near the town clerk’s office, not less than 30 nor more than 40 days before the meeting. If a municipality has more than one polling place and the polling places are not all in the same building, the warning and notice shall be posted in at least two public places within each voting district and in or near the town clerk’s office.

In addition, the warning shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the municipality at least five days before the meeting, unless the warning is published in the town report and distributed as provided in

24 V.S.A. § 1682

. The legislative body annually shall designate the paper in which such a warning may be published. The warning shall also be posted on the municipality’s website, if the municipality actively updates its website on a regular basis.

No such warning shall be required for municipal informational meetings at which no voting is to take place.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 98;

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

1999, No. 148

(Adj. Sess.), § 85, eff. May 24, 2000;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 66.

§ 2642.
Warning and notice contents.

The warning shall include the date and time of the election, location of the polling place or places, and the nature of the meeting or election.
(a) (1) The warning shall include the date and time of the election, location of the polling place or places, and the nature of the meeting or election.

It shall, by separate articles, specifically indicate the business to be transacted, to include the offices and the questions to be voted upon.

The warning shall also contain any article or articles requested by a petition signed by at least five percent of the voters of the municipality and filed with the municipal clerk not less than 47 days before the day of the meeting.
(3) (A) The warning shall also contain any article or articles requested by a petition signed by at least five percent of the voters of the municipality and filed with the municipal clerk not less than 47 days before the day of the meeting.

The clerk receiving the petitions shall immediately proceed to examine them to ascertain whether they contain the required number of signatures of registered voters set forth in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3). If found not to conform, he or she shall state in writing on the petition why it cannot be accepted, and within 24 hours from receipt, he or she shall return it to the petitioners. In this case, supplementary petitions may be filed not later than 48 hours after the petition was returned to the petitioners by the clerk or the filing deadline set forth in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3), whichever is later. However, supplementary petitions shall not be accepted if petitions with signatures of different persons totaling at least the number specified in subdivision (A) of this subdivision (3) were not filed by the filing deadline.

A petition submitted under this subdivision (3):

may include more than one proposed article;

shall contain the petition language on each page on which signatures are collected; and

shall include the printed name, signature, and street address of each voter who signed the petition.

A voter may withdraw his or her name from a petitioned article at any time prior to the signing of the warning by a majority of the legislative body.

The posted notice that accompanies the warning shall include information on voter registration, information on early or absentee voting where applicable, and other appropriate information.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 99;

2001, No. 6

, § 12(c), eff. April 10, 2001;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 46;

2015, No. 30

, § 23, eff. May 26, 2015.

§ 2643.
Special meetings.

The legislative body may warn a special municipal meeting when it deems it necessary and shall call a special meeting on the application of five percent of the voters. A special meeting shall be warned within 60 days of receipt of the application by the municipal clerk. A voter may withdraw his or her name from a petition for a special meeting at any time prior to the signing of the warning by a majority of the legislative body.

[Repealed.]

The legislative body may rescind the call of a special meeting called by them but not a special meeting called on application of five percent of the voters.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 47;

2015, No. 30

, § 24, eff. May 26, 2015.

2014.

History

2014.

In subsec. (a), in the first sentence, substituted “it deems” for “they deem” to correct a grammatical error.

Amendments

—2015.

Subsec. (a): Substituted “60 days” for “15 days” and “municipal clerk” for “town clerk” in the second sentence and added the third sentence.

—2013 (Adj. Sess.).

Subsec. (a): Substituted “warned” for “called” preceding “within 15 days” and “town clerk” for “legislative body” at the end.

Subsec. (b): Repealed.

§ 2644.
Warnings.

The original warning for each municipal meeting shall be signed by a majority of the legislative body and shall be filed with the clerk and recorded before being posted.
When all positions on the legislative body are vacant, warnings may be signed by the clerk.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2645.
Charters; adoption, repeal, or amendment; procedure.

A municipality may propose to the General Assembly to adopt, repeal, or amend its charter by majority vote of the legal voters of the municipality present and voting at any annual or special meeting warned for that purpose in accordance with the following procedure:

A proposal to adopt, repeal, or amend a municipal charter (charter proposal) may be made by the legislative body of the municipality or by petition of five percent of the voters of the municipality.

An official copy of the charter proposal shall be filed as a public record in the office of the clerk of the municipality at least 10 days before the first public hearing. The clerk shall certify the date on which he or she received the official copy, and the dated copies thereof shall be made available to members of the public upon request.

The legislative body of the municipality shall hold at least two public hearings prior to the meeting to vote on the charter proposal.
(3) (A) The legislative body of the municipality shall hold at least two public hearings prior to the meeting to vote on the charter proposal.

The first public hearing shall be held in accordance with subdivision (a)(2) of this section and at least 30 days before the vote.

If the charter proposal is made by the legislative body, the legislative body may revise the proposal as a result of suggestions and recommendations made at a public hearing, but in no event shall such revisions be made less than 20 days before the date of the meeting to vote on the charter proposal.
(4) (A) If the charter proposal is made by the legislative body, the legislative body may revise the proposal as a result of suggestions and recommendations made at a public hearing, but in no event shall such revisions be made less than 20 days before the date of the meeting to vote on the charter proposal.

If revisions are made, the legislative body shall post a notice of these revisions in the same places as the warning for the meeting not less than 20 days before the date of the meeting and shall attach such revisions to the official copy kept on file for public inspection in the office of the clerk of the municipality.

If the charter proposal is made by petition, the second public hearing shall be held no later than 10 days after the first public hearing. The legislative body shall not have the authority to revise a charter proposal made by petition.
(5) (A) If the charter proposal is made by petition, the second public hearing shall be held no later than 10 days after the first public hearing. The legislative body shall not have the authority to revise a charter proposal made by petition.

After the warning and hearing requirements of this section are satisfied, the petitioned charter proposal shall be submitted to the voters at the next annual meeting, primary, or general election in the form in which it was filed, except that the legislative body may make technical corrections.

Notice of each public hearing and of the annual or special meeting shall be given in accordance with section 2641 of this chapter.
(6) (A) Notice of each public hearing and of the annual or special meeting shall be given in accordance with section 2641 of this chapter.

Each notice shall specify the charter sections to be adopted, repealed, or amended, setting out those sections in the amended form, with deleted matter struck through and new matter underlined.
(B) (i) Each notice shall specify the charter sections to be adopted, repealed, or amended, setting out those sections in the amended form, with deleted matter struck through and new matter underlined.

If the legislative body of the municipality determines that the charter proposal is too long or unwieldy to set out in amended form, the notice shall include a concise summary of the charter proposal and shall state that an official copy of the charter proposal is on file for public inspection in the office of the clerk of the municipality and that copies thereof shall be made available to members of the public upon request.

Voting on a charter proposal shall be by Australian ballot.
(7) (A) Voting on a charter proposal shall be by Australian ballot.

The ballot shall show each charter section to be adopted, repealed, or amended in the amended form, with deleted matter struck through and new matter underlined, and shall permit the voter to vote on each separate proposal contained within the charter proposal.
(B) (i) The ballot shall show each charter section to be adopted, repealed, or amended in the amended form, with deleted matter struck through and new matter underlined, and shall permit the voter to vote on each separate proposal contained within the charter proposal.

If the legislative body determines that the charter proposal is too long or unwieldy to be shown in the amended form, voters shall be permitted to vote upon each separate proposal in its entirety in the form of a yes or no proposition.

An official copy of the charter proposal shall be posted conspicuously in each ballot booth for inspection by the voters during the balloting.

The clerk of the municipality, under the direction of the legislative body, shall announce and post the results of the vote immediately after the vote is counted.
(b) (1) The clerk of the municipality, under the direction of the legislative body, shall announce and post the results of the vote immediately after the vote is counted.

The clerk, within 10 days after the day of the meeting, shall certify to the Secretary of State each separate proposal contained within the charter proposal, showing the facts as to its origin and the procedure followed, which shall include:

If the charter proposal was made by the legislative body, the minutes recorded by the legislative body that detail the origins and intent of each separate proposal;
(A) (i) If the charter proposal was made by the legislative body, the minutes recorded by the legislative body that detail the origins and intent of each separate proposal;

If the charter proposal was made by voter petition, the body of the petition and evidence of the required number of petition signatures;

A copy of the official certified copy of the charter proposal filed with the clerk of the municipality pursuant to subdivision (a)(2) of this section;

Copies of the warnings and published notices for each of the public hearings held pursuant to subdivision (a)(3) of this section;

Minutes recorded by the legislative body that detail each of the public hearings held pursuant to subdivision (a)(3) of this section;

Copies of warnings and published notices for the meeting to vote on the charter proposal; and

A copy of the ballot and the results of the vote or votes on the charter proposal.

After confirming that the clerk of the municipality has certified each of the documents listed in subdivision (b)(2) of this section, the Secretary of State shall file the certificate and deliver copies of it to the Attorney General, the Clerk of the House, the Secretary of the Senate, and the chairs of the committees concerned with municipal charters of both houses of the General Assembly.

The charter proposal shall become effective upon affirmative enactment of the proposal, either as proposed or as amended by the General Assembly.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1979, No. 200

(Adj. Sess.), § 100;

1981, No. 239

(Adj. Sess.), § 22, eff. May 4, 1982;

1983, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.);

1987, No. 63

; 2017, No. M-7, § 2A, eff. May 22, 2017.

§ 2646.
Town officers; qualification; election.

At the annual meeting, a town shall choose from among its registered voters the following town officers, who shall serve until the next annual meeting and until successors are chosen, unless otherwise provided by law:

A moderator.

A town clerk, unless the town has voted to authorize the selectboard to appoint the town clerk as provided in section 2651e of this chapter. The term of office for a town clerk shall be for one year, unless a town votes that the clerk shall be elected for a term of three years. When a town votes for a three-year term for the office of town clerk, that three-year term shall remain in effect until the town rescinds it by the majority vote of the legal voters present and voting at an annual meeting, duly warned for that purpose.

A town treasurer, unless the town has voted to authorize the selectboard to appoint the treasurer as provided in section 2651f of this chapter. The term of office of a town treasurer shall be for one year, unless a town votes that a town treasurer shall be elected for a term of three years. When a town votes for a three-year term for the office of town treasurer, that three-year term shall remain in effect until the town rescinds it by the majority vote of the legal voters present and voting at an annual meeting, duly warned for that purpose.

One selectboard member for a term of three years who shall be elected by ballot.

One lister for a term of three years who shall be elected by ballot, unless the town has voted to eliminate the office of lister in accordance with the provisions of section 2651c of this chapter.

One auditor for the term of three years who shall be elected by ballot, unless the town has voted to eliminate the office of auditor in accordance with the provisions of section 2651b of this chapter.

A first constable, and if needed a second constable, unless the town has voted to authorize the selectboard to appoint constables as provided in section 2651a of this chapter. The terms of office of the first and second constable elected or appointed shall be for one year unless a town votes that they shall be elected or appointed for terms of two years. When a town votes for a two-year term for the offices of first and second constable, the two-year terms shall remain in effect until the town rescinds them by a majority vote of the legal voters voting at an annual meeting, duly warned for that purpose.

[Repealed.]

A collector of delinquent taxes, if the town so votes, for a term of one year unless a town votes that a collector of delinquent taxes shall be elected for a term of three years. When a town votes for a three-year term for the collector of delinquent taxes, that three-year term shall remain in effect until the town rescinds it by the majority vote of the legal voters present and voting at an annual meeting, duly warned for that purpose.

[Repealed.]

[Repealed.]

A trustee of public funds if the town so votes.

A trustee of public money, but only in towns that retain possession of a portion of the surplus funds of the United States received under the Act of 1836.

A cemetery commissioner if the town so votes.

One or more patrol officers to patrol town highways under the direction of the selectboard, if the town so votes.

One or two road commissioners who shall be elected by ballot if the town so votes; otherwise they shall be appointed by the selectboard as provided in section 2651 of this chapter. The road commissioners shall be elected for a term of one year unless a town votes that the commissioners shall be elected for a term of two or three years. When a town votes for a two-year or three-year term for the office of road commissioner, that two-year or three-year term shall remain in effect until the town rescinds it by the majority vote of the legal voters present and voting at an annual meeting, duly warned for that purpose.

Three water commissioners, unless the town votes to elect additional selectboard members, in which case the number of water commissioners shall, at the discretion of the selectboard members, be the same as the number of members that comprise the selectboard. The commissioners shall be elected by ballot if the town so votes; otherwise they shall be appointed by the selectboard as provided in section 2651 of this chapter.

Five members of an advisory budget committee, if the town so votes, unless the town votes to elect additional advisory budget committee members. The advisory budget committee members shall be elected by ballot, unless the town votes to have those members appointed by the selectboard.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1983, No. 218

(Adj. Sess.);

1991, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1997, No. 83

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

1999, No. 22

, § 1;

1999, No. 73

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2001, No. 3

, § 1;

2013, No. 21

, § 1;

2013, No. 106

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2013, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 48;

2013, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 5;

2017, No. 27

, § 1, eff. May 10, 2017;

2017, No. 93

(Adj. Sess.), § 1;

2019, No. 84

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2647.
Incompatible offices.

An auditor shall not be town clerk, town treasurer, selectboard member, first constable, collector of current or delinquent taxes, trustee of public funds, town manager, road commissioner, water commissioner, sewage system commissioner, sewage disposal commissioner, cemetery commissioner, or town school district director; nor shall a spouse of or any person assisting any of these officers in the discharge of official duties be eligible to hold office as auditor.
(a) (1) An auditor shall not be town clerk, town treasurer, selectboard member, first constable, collector of current or delinquent taxes, trustee of public funds, town manager, road commissioner, water commissioner, sewage system commissioner, sewage disposal commissioner, cemetery commissioner, or town school district director; nor shall a spouse of or any person assisting any of these officers in the discharge of official duties be eligible to hold office as auditor.

A selectboard member or school director shall not be first constable, collector of taxes, town treasurer, assistant town treasurer, auditor, or town agent.
(2) (A) A selectboard member or school director shall not be first constable, collector of taxes, town treasurer, assistant town treasurer, auditor, or town agent.

A selectboard member shall not be lister or assessor.

A cemetery commissioner or library trustee shall not be town treasurer, assistant town treasurer, or auditor.

A town manager shall not hold any elective office in that town or town school district.

Election officers at local elections shall be disqualified as provided in section 2456 of this title.

Notwithstanding subsection (a) of this section, if a school district prepares and reports its budget independently from the budget of the town and the school district is audited by an independent public accountant, a school director or spouse of a school director shall be eligible to hold office as auditor, town treasurer, or assistant town treasurer.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1985, No. 196

(Adj. Sess.), § 6;

1993, No. 91

, § 2;

2009, No. 44

, § 5, eff. May 21, 2009;

2013, No. 21

, § 2;

2013, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 7;

2019, No. 14

, § 47, eff. April 30, 2019;

2019, No. 67

, § 19, eff. June 17, 2019;

2019, No. 117

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. June 23, 2020.

§ 2648.
Exceptions.

Section 2647 of this title shall not apply to towns having not more than 25 legal voters, but in these towns an auditor shall not audit his or her own accounts kept and rendered in some other official capacity, nor shall the husband or wife of any town official audit his or her spouse’s official accounts.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2649.
Number of officers.

Each town shall have:
(a) (1) Each town shall have:

three selectboard members, unless additional selectboard members are elected under the provisions of section 2650 of this chapter;

three listers, unless additional listers are elected under the provisions of section 2650 of this chapter or the town has voted to eliminate the office of lister under the provisions of section 2651c of this chapter; and

three auditors, unless the town has voted to eliminate the office of auditor under the provisions of section 2651b of this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided, at each annual meeting, one selectboard member, one lister, and one auditor shall be elected, each for a term of three years.

A town so voting may elect one or two road commissioners for a term of one, two, or three years, as provided in section 2646 of this chapter.

A town so voting may elect three water commissioners. The terms of the water commissioners shall be the same as those of selectboard members under sections 2646 and 2650 of this chapter, except that of those commissioners first elected, one shall have a term of one year, one a term of two years, and one a term of three years. One or two additional water commissioners may be authorized for one- or two-year terms as provided in subsection 2650(b) of this chapter relating to additional selectboard members.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1999, No. 73

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2013, No. 21

, § 3.

§ 2650.
Additional listers and selectboard members.

Additional listers. A town may vote at a special or annual town meeting to elect two additional listers for terms of one year each.

Additional selectboard members.

A town may vote at a special or annual town meeting to elect two additional selectboard members for terms of either one or two years each.
(1) (A) A town may vote at a special or annual town meeting to elect two additional selectboard members for terms of either one or two years each.

When the terms of the additional selectboard members are to be for two years, the warning for the meeting shall so specify.

If two additional selectboard member positions are created, they shall be for terms of the same length, but if the terms of the new positions are to be for two years, when the additional selectboard members are first elected, one shall be elected for one year and the other selectboard member for two years.
(2) (A) If two additional selectboard member positions are created, they shall be for terms of the same length, but if the terms of the new positions are to be for two years, when the additional selectboard members are first elected, one shall be elected for one year and the other selectboard member for two years.

Terms of these additional selectboard members shall end on annual meeting days. If the additional selectboard members are elected at a special meeting, the term of those elected for one year shall expire on the next annual meeting day and those elected for two years shall expire on the second annual meeting day following their election.

Discontinuing additional listers or selectboard members.

A vote establishing additional listers or selectboard members shall remain in effect until the town votes to discontinue the two additional positions at an annual or special meeting duly warned for that purpose.

The term of office of any lister or selectboard member in office on the date a town votes to discontinue that office shall expire on the 31st day after the vote, unless a petition for reconsideration or rescission of that vote is filed with the clerk of the municipality in accordance with section 2661 of this chapter, in which case that section shall control.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2017, No. 50

, § 50.

§ 2651.
Road and water commissioners; appointment, removal.

Unless the town votes to elect road commissioners, the selectboard shall appoint forthwith one or two road commissioners and may remove from office a road commissioner appointed by them, for just cause after due notice and hearing. The selectboard may appoint one or two members of their own board to serve as road commissioners.

Unless the town votes to elect water commissioners, the selectboard shall appoint forthwith no less than three nor more than five water commissioners, unless there is no existing, or prospective, municipal water system for such commissioners to supervise. The selectboard may remove an appointed water commissioner from office for just cause after due notice and hearing. The selectboard may appoint members of their own board to serve as water commissioners.

HISTORY:

Added

1977, No. 269

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

1999, No. 22

, § 2.

§ 2651a.
Constables; appointment; removal.

A town may vote by Australian ballot at an annual meeting to authorize the selectboard to appoint a first constable, and if needed a second constable, in which case at least a first constable shall be appointed.
(a) (1) A town may vote by Australian ballot at an annual meeting to authorize the selectboard to appoint a first constable, and if needed a second constable, in which case at least a first constable shall be appointed.

A constable so appointed may be removed by the selectboard for just cause after notice and hearing.

When a town votes to authorize the selectboard to appoint constables, the selectboard’s authority to make such appointments shall remain in effect until the town rescinds that authority by the majority vote of the registered voters present and voting at an annual meeting, duly warned for that purpose.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (a) to the contrary, a vote to authorize the selectboard to appoint constables shall become effective only upon a two-thirds vote of those present and voting, if a written protest against the authorization is filed with the selectboard at least 15 days before the vote by at least five percent of the voters of the town.

The authority to authorize the selectboard to appoint the constable as provided in this section shall extend to all towns except those that have a charter that specifically provides for the election or appointment of the office of constable.

HISTORY:

Added

1991, No. 177

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 1.

§ 2651b.
Elimination of office of auditor; appointment of public accountant.

A town may vote by ballot at an annual meeting to eliminate the office of town auditor.
(a) (1) A town may vote by ballot at an annual meeting to eliminate the office of town auditor.

If a town votes to eliminate the office of town auditor, the selectboard shall contract with a public accountant licensed in this State to perform an annual financial audit of all funds of the town except the funds audited pursuant to

16 V.S.A. § 323

.
(2) (A) If a town votes to eliminate the office of town auditor, the selectboard shall contract with a public accountant licensed in this State to perform an annual financial audit of all funds of the town except the funds audited pursuant to

16 V.S.A. § 323

.

Unless otherwise provided by law, the selectboard shall provide for all other auditor’s duties to be performed.

A vote to eliminate the office of town auditor shall remain in effect until rescinded by majority vote of the registered voters present and voting, by ballot, at an annual meeting duly warned for that purpose.

The term of office of any auditor in office on the date a town votes to eliminate that office shall expire on the 45th day after such vote or on the date upon which the selectboard enters into a contract with a public accountant under this section, whichever occurs first.

The authority to vote to eliminate the office of town auditor as provided in this section shall extend to all towns except those towns that have a charter that specifically provides for the election or appointment of the office of town auditor.

HISTORY:

Added

1997, No. 83

(Adj. Sess.), § 2; amended

2011, No. 129

(Adj. Sess.), § 28, eff. July 1, 2013; amended

2013, No. 21

, § 3a;

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 2.

§ 2651c.
Lack of elected lister; appointment of lister; elimination of office.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary and except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, in the event the board of listers of a town falls below a majority and the selectboard is unable to find a person or persons to appoint as a lister or listers under the provisions of

24 V.S.A. § 963

, the selectboard may appoint an assessor to perform the duties of a lister as set forth in Title 32 until the next annual meeting.
(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provisions of law to the contrary and except as provided in subsection (b) of this section, in the event the board of listers of a town falls below a majority and the selectboard is unable to find a person or persons to appoint as a lister or listers under the provisions of

24 V.S.A. § 963

, the selectboard may appoint an assessor to perform the duties of a lister as set forth in Title 32 until the next annual meeting.

The appointed person need not be a resident of the town and shall have the same powers and be subject to the same duties and penalties as a duly elected lister for the town.

A town may vote by ballot at an annual meeting to eliminate the office of lister.
(b) (1) A town may vote by ballot at an annual meeting to eliminate the office of lister.

If a town votes to eliminate the office of lister, the selectboard shall contract with or employ a professionally qualified assessor, who need not be a resident of the town.
(2) (A) If a town votes to eliminate the office of lister, the selectboard shall contract with or employ a professionally qualified assessor, who need not be a resident of the town.

The assessor shall have the same powers, discharge the same duties, proceed in the discharge thereof in the same manner, and be subject to the same liabilities as are prescribed for listers or the board of listers under the provisions of Title 32.

A vote to eliminate the office of lister shall remain in effect until rescinded by majority vote of the registered voters present and voting at an annual meeting warned for that purpose.

The term of office of any lister in office on the date a town votes to eliminate that office shall expire on the 45th day after the vote or on the date upon which the selectboard appoints an assessor under this subsection, whichever occurs first.

The authority to vote to eliminate the office of lister as provided in this section shall extend to all towns except those towns that have a charter that specifically provides for the election or appointment of the office of lister.

HISTORY:

Added

2003, No. 125

(Adj. Sess.), § 1; amended

2013, No. 21

, § 4;

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 3.

§ 2651d.
Collector of delinquent taxes; appointment; removal.

A municipality may vote at an annual or special municipal meeting to authorize the legislative body to appoint a collector of delinquent taxes, who may be the municipal treasurer.
(a) (1) A municipality may vote at an annual or special municipal meeting to authorize the legislative body to appoint a collector of delinquent taxes, who may be the municipal treasurer.

A collector of delinquent taxes so appointed may be removed by the legislative body for just cause after notice and hearing.

When a municipality votes to authorize the legislative body to appoint a collector of delinquent taxes, the legislative body’s authority to make such appointment shall remain in effect until the municipality rescinds that authority by the majority vote of the registered voters present and voting at an annual or special meeting, duly warned for that purpose.

HISTORY:

Added

2013, No. 162

(Adj. Sess.), § 6; amended

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 4.

§ 2651e.
Municipal clerk; appointment; removal.

A municipality may vote at an annual meeting to authorize the legislative body to appoint the municipal clerk.
(a) (1) A municipality may vote at an annual meeting to authorize the legislative body to appoint the municipal clerk.

A municipal clerk so appointed may be removed by the legislative body for just cause after notice and hearing.

A vote to authorize the legislative body to appoint the municipal clerk shall remain in effect until rescinded by the majority vote of the registered voters present and voting at an annual or special meeting, duly warned for that purpose.

The term of office of a municipal clerk in office on the date a municipality votes to allow the legislative body to appoint a municipal clerk shall expire 45 calendar days after the vote or on the date upon which the legislative body appoints a municipal clerk under this section, whichever occurs first, unless a petition for reconsideration or rescission is filed in accordance with section 2661 of this title.

The authority to authorize the legislative body to appoint the municipal clerk as provided in this section shall extend to all municipalities except those that have a charter that specifically provides for the election or appointment of the office of municipal clerk.

HISTORY:

Added

2017, No. 27

, § 2, eff. May 10, 2017; amended

2017, No. 130

(Adj. Sess.), § 5.